Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-501
State educational institutions; nonresident fees.

All state educational institutions shall charge nonresident fees to be paid by nonresidents of Nebraska who shall matriculate at any such institution, and the governing board of each institution may fix and collect such fees. Subject to the minimum standards provided by section 85-502, resident status shall be determined at the time of each registration according to rules and regulations which the governing board of each institution shall establish.

Laws 1923, c. 57, § 1, p. 178;

C.S.1929, § 85-501;

R.S.1943, § 85-501;

Laws 1947, c. 355, § 1, p. 1106;

Laws 1980, LB 304, § 1.